Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1218
Nebraska Commission
on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; continuing legal education; duties;
enumerated.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement
and Criminal Justice, after consultation with the council, shall:

(1) Establish curricula for the implementation of a mandatory
continuing legal education program, including instruction providing a working
knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction on the
investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, for county attorneys
and deputy county attorneys;

(2) Administer all programs of continuing legal education,
including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement
principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes
against children, for county attorneys and deputy county attorneys required
under sections 23-1212 to 23-1222;

(3) Evaluate the effectiveness of programs of continuing legal
education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic
speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution
of crimes against children, required under sections 23-1212 to 23-1222;

(4) Certify the number of hours of continuing legal education,
including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement
principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes
against children, completed by a county attorney and deputy county attorney
as required under sections 23-1212 to 23-1222 and maintain all records relating
thereto;

(5) Report to the Attorney General the names of all county
attorneys and deputy county attorneys who have failed to complete the number
of hours of continuing legal education, including instruction providing a
working knowledge of electronic speed measurement principles and instruction
on the investigation and prosecution of crimes against children, as required
under section 23-1217;

(6) Establish tuition and fees for all programs of continuing
legal education, including instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic
speed measurement principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution
of crimes against children, as required under sections 23-1212 to 23-1222;

(7) Adopt and promulgate necessary rules and regulations for
the effective delivery of all programs of continuing legal education, including
instruction providing a working knowledge of electronic speed measurement
principles and instruction on the investigation and prosecution of crimes
against children, for county attorneys and deputy county attorneys as required
under sections 23-1212 to 23-1222;

(8) Do all things necessary to carry out the purpose of training
county attorneys and deputy county attorneys as required by sections 23-1212
to 23-1222; and

(9) Receive and distribute appropriated funds to the Nebraska
County Attorneys Association to develop, administer, and conduct continuing
legal education seminars, prepare and publish trial manuals and other publications,
and take any other measure that will enhance the investigation and prosecution
of crime in this state.

Laws 1980, LB 790, § 7;

Laws 1990, LB 1246, § 4;

Laws 2009, LB671, § 6.